Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-101
Members; credentials; filing; officers pro tempore.

The Clerk of the Legislature shall file the certificates presented by members, and make a roll of the members who thus appear to be elected. The persons thus appearing to be elected members shall proceed to elect such other officers as may be required for the time being.

R.S.1866, c. 31, § 3, p. 249;

R.S.1913, § 3742;

C.S.1922, § 3135;

C.S.1929, § 50-101;

R.S.1943, § 50-101.